District of Columbia statutes.
7-2121

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Emergency contraception” means a drug or drug regimen approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to prevent pregnancy when administered after sexual contact, including oral contraceptive pills.

(2)

“Hospital” means a facility that provides 24-hour inpatient care, including diagnostic, therapeutic, and other health-related services, for a variety of physical or mental conditions, and may, in addition, provide outpatient services, particularly emergency care.

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-346, § 2, 56 DCR 966